Vermont statutes. Title 11B Nonprofit Corporations
Subchapter 5. Delegates

§ 6.50.
Delegates.

A corporation may provide in its articles or bylaws for delegates having some or all of the authority of members.

The articles or bylaws may set forth provisions relating to:

the characteristics, qualifications, rights, limitations, and obligations of delegates, including their selection and removal;

calling, noticing, holding, and conducting meetings of delegates; and

carrying on corporate activities during and between meetings of delegates.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.